Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB45.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 121.015 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Registry" means the Kentucky Registry of Election Finance;
(2) "Election" means any primary, regular, or special election to fill vacancies regardless of whether a candidate or
slate of candidates is opposed or unopposed in an election. Each primary, regular, or special election shall be
considered a separate election;
(3) "Committee" includes the following:
(a) "Campaign committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make
expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for
nomination or election to any state, county, city, or district office, that is authorized by the candidate or
slate of candidates to receive contributions, make expenditures, and generally conduct a campaign for
the candidate or slate of candidates, but does not include an entity established solely by a candidate
which is managed solely by a candidate and a campaign treasurer and whose name is generic in nature,
such as "Friends of (the candidate)," and does not reflect that other persons have structured themselves
as a committee, designated officers of the committee, and assigned responsibilities and duties to each
officer with the purpose of managing a campaign to support or oppose a candidate in an election;
(b) "Independent expenditure-only committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive
unlimited contributions for the purpose of making only independent expenditures to support or oppose
one (1) or more specific candidates or slates of candidates for nomination or election to any state,
county, city, or district office;
(c) "Caucus campaign committee," which means members of one (1) of the following caucus groups who
receive contributions and make expenditures to support or oppose one (1) or more specific candidates or
slates of candidates for nomination or election, or a committee:
1. House Democratic caucus campaign committee;
2. House Republican caucus campaign committee;
3. Senate Democratic caucus campaign committee;
4. Senate Republican caucus campaign committee; or
5. Subdivisions of the state executive committee of a minor political party, which serve the same
function as the above-named committees, as determined by regulations promulgated by the
registry;
(d) "Political issues committee," which means three (3) or more persons joining together to advocate or
oppose a[ constitutional amendment or public question which appears on the] ballot measure if that
committee receives or expends money in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(e) "Permanent committee," which means a group of individuals, including an association, committee, or
organization, other than a campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee, federally
registered political committee, political issues committee, inaugural committee, caucus campaign
committee, or party executive committee, which is established as, or intended to be, a permanent
organization having as a primary purpose expressly advocating the election or defeat of one (1) or more
clearly identified candidates, slates of candidates, or political parties, which functions on a regular basis
throughout the year;
(f) An executive committee of a political party; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(g) "Inaugural committee," which means one (1) or more persons who receive contributions and make
expenditures in support of inauguration activities for any candidate or slate of candidates elected to any
state, county, city, or district office;
(4) "Contributing organization" means a group which merely contributes to candidates, slates of candidates,
campaign committees, caucus campaign committees, or executive committees from time to time from funds
derived solely from within the group, and which does not solicit or receive funds from sources outside the
group itself. Any contributions made by the groups in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be reported to
the registry;
(5) "Testimonial affair" means an affair held in honor of a person who holds or who is or was a candidate for
nomination or election to a political office in this state designed to raise funds for any purpose not charitable,
religious, or educational;
(6) "Contribution" means any:
(a) Payment, distribution, loan, deposit, or gift of money or other thing of value, to a candidate, his or her
agent, a slate of candidates, its authorized agent, a committee, or contributing organization. As used in
this subsection, "loan" shall include a guarantee, endorsement, or other form of security where the risk
of nonpayment rests with the surety, guarantor, or endorser, as well as with a committee, contributing
organization, candidate, slate of candidates, or other primary obligor. No person shall become liable as
surety, endorser, or guarantor for any sum in any one (1) election which, when combined with all other
contributions the individual makes to a candidate, his or her agent, a slate of candidates, its agent, a
committee, or a contributing organization, exceeds the contribution limits provided in KRS 121.150;
(b) Payment by any person other than the candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its
authorized treasurer, a committee, or a contributing organization, of compensation for the personal
services of another person which are rendered to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or
contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(c) Goods, advertising, or services with a value of more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate in
any one (1) election which are furnished to a candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing
organization or for inauguration activities without charge, or at a rate which is less than the rate
normally charged for the goods or services; or
(d) Payment by any person other than a candidate, his or her authorized treasurer, a slate of candidates, its
authorized treasurer, a committee, or contributing organization for any goods or services with a value of
more than one hundred dollars ($100) in the aggregate in any one (1) election which are utilized by a
candidate, slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization, or for inauguration activities;
(7) Notwithstanding the foregoing meanings of "contribution," the word shall not be construed to include:
(a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on
behalf of a candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or contributing organization;
(b) A loan of money by any financial institution doing business in Kentucky made in accordance with
applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of business; or
(c) An independent expenditure by any individual or permanent committee;
(8) "Candidate" means any person who has received contributions or made expenditures, has appointed a
campaign treasurer, or has given his or her consent for any other person to receive contributions or make
expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to a nonfederal public office,
except as provided in subsection (10)(b) of Section 8 of this Act[federal office];
(9) "Slate of candidates" means:
(a) Between the time a certificate or petition of nomination has been filed for a candidate for the office of
Governor under KRS 118.365 and the time the candidate designates a running mate for the office of
Lieutenant Governor under KRS 118.126, a slate of candidates consists of the candidate for the office
of Governor; and
(b) After that candidate has designated a running mate under KRS 118.126, that same slate of candidates
consists of that same candidate for the office of Governor and the candidate's running mate for the
office of Lieutenant Governor. Unless the context requires otherwise, any provision of law that
applies to a candidate shall also apply to a slate of candidates;

CHAPTER 57 3
(10) "Knowingly" means, with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense,
that a person is aware or should have been aware that his or her conduct is of that nature or that the
circumstance exists;
(11) "Fundraiser" means an individual who directly solicits and secures contributions on behalf of a candidate or
slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or an office in a jurisdiction with a population in excess
of two hundred thousand (200,000) residents;
(12) "Independent expenditure" means:
(a) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which expressly advocates the
election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate or slate of candidates, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them[,];
and[ which ]
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate, slate of candidates,
campaign committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of any of them; or
(b) The expenditure of money or other things of value for a communication which expressly advocates
or opposes a ballot measure, and which:
1. Is made without any coordination, consultation, or cooperation with any political issues
committee, or any authorized person acting on behalf of a political issues committee; and
2. Is not made in concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, any political issues committee,
or any authorized person acting on behalf of a political issues committee;
(13) "Electronic reporting" means the use of technology, having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities, by which an individual or other entity submits, compiles, or transmits
campaign finance reports to the registry, or by which the registry receives, stores, analyzes, or discloses the
reports;
(14) "Security procedure" means a procedure employed for the purpose of verifying that an electronic signature,
record, or performance is that of a specific person or for detecting changes or errors in the information in an
electronic record. The term includes a procedure that requires the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying
words or numbers, encryption, or callback or other acknowledgment procedures;
(15) "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a
record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record;
(16) "Filer" means any candidate, a slate of candidates, committee, or other individual or entity required to submit
financial disclosure reports to the registry;
(17) "Filer-side software" means software provided to or used by the filer that enables transmittal of financial
reports to the registry;
(18) "Form" means an online web page or an electronic document designed to capture, validate, and submit data for
processing to the registry, unless the context otherwise prescribes;[ and]
(19) "Reasonable cause" means an event, happening, or circumstance entirely beyond the knowledge or control of
the candidate, slate of candidates, or committee, which has exercised due care and prudence in maintaining the
records of the campaign or committee pursuant to statute or administrative regulation;
(20) "Foreign national" means:
(a) An individual who is not a citizen or lawful permanent resident of the United States;
(b) A government, political subdivision, or municipality of a foreign country;
(c) A foreign political party;
(d) Any entity, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of or has its principal place of business in a
foreign country; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(e) Any entity in the United States, including but not limited to a partnership, association, corporation,
or organization that is wholly or majority owned by any foreign national, unless:
1. Any contribution or expenditure the entity makes derives entirely from funds generated by the
entity's United States operations; and
2. All decisions concerning the contribution or expenditure, except for setting overall budget
amounts, are made by individuals who are United States citizens or permanent residents;
(21) "Ballot measure" means a question, other than the nomination or election of a candidate for public office,
which has been:
(a) Approved by a political subdivision or the General Assembly and is required by law to be placed
before the voters of the territory affected; or
(b) Initiated or referred by citizen petition as authorized by KRS 242.020 and placed before the voters of
the territory affected;
(22) "Preliminary activity" includes but is not limited to:
(a) Participating in focus groups;
(b) Making telephone calls;
(c) Traveling;
(d) Conducting polls; and
(e) Drafting ballot measure language; and
(23) "Tax-exempt organization" means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c) and exempt from
federal taxation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(a). This subsection shall not be construed to treat a political
organization under 26 U.S.C. sec. 527 as a tax-exempt organization for purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon registering a political issues committee, the treasurer shall file an accompanying certification that no
preliminary activity was directly or indirectly funded by a foreign national.
(2) After a political issues committee has been registered, the committee shall not knowingly or willfully
receive, solicit, or accept contributions or expenditures that are directly or indirectly funded by a foreign
national.
(3) A political issues committee shall affirm in its report that it has not knowingly or willfully received,
solicited, or accepted contributions or expenditures from a foreign national.
(4) Any person who makes an independent expenditure in support or opposition of a ballot measure shall keep
records of any contribution or independent expenditure and retain those records for six (6) years following
the date the contribution or expenditure was made.
(5) A political issues committee that receives a contribution or makes expenditures shall keep records of any
contribution received or expenditure made and retain those records for six (6) years following the date the
contribution was received or the expenditure was made.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Upon a political issues committee's receipt of a contribution, the treasurer shall obtain from the donor an
affirmation that the donor is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully accepted funds
aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from a foreign national during the four
(4) years immediately preceding the date the contribution was made.
(2) The treasurer of a political issues committee shall affirm in its report that the donor associated with each
contribution is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully received, solicited, or accepted,
whether directly or indirectly, contributions or expenditures aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000) from a foreign national during the four (4) years immediately preceding the date the
contribution was made.
(3) Within forty-eight (48) hours of making an independent expenditure supporting or opposing a ballot
measure, the person or entity making the expenditure shall:

CHAPTER 57 5
(a) Certify to the registry that the person or entity has not knowingly or willfully accepted funds
aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from a foreign national for four
(4) years immediately preceding the date the expenditure was made, and that it will not do so through
the remainder of the calendar year in which the ballot measure will appear on the ballot; and
(b) Affirm in the person's or entity's report that the person or entity has not knowingly or willfully
accepted funds aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from a foreign
national during the four (4) years immediately preceding the date the expenditure was made.
(4) Any determination that an entity required to file one (1) or more certifications under subsection (1) or (3)(a)
of this section has accepted funds aggregating in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) from
one (1) or more foreign nationals during the four (4) years immediately preceding the date the contribution
or independent expenditure at issue was made shall create a presumption that the person or political issues
committee has violated this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A foreign national shall not, directly or indirectly:
(a) Make a donation, contribution, or expenditure in support or opposition of a ballot measure;
(b) Solicit another person to make a donation, contribution, or expenditure to influence a ballot
measure; or
(c) Direct, dictate, control, or participate in another person's decision to influence a ballot measure.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to create or eliminate any donor disclosure rights or duties beyond
those specifically enumerated in Section 6 of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The registry may bring a civil action to enforce Sections 2 and 3 of this Act and a committee, person, or
entity alleged to have violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act shall be provided full opportunity of notice,
discovery, and an opportunity to be heard before being found liable for a violation of Section 2 or 3 of this
Act.
(2) In all actions brought under subsection (1) of this section, the registry bears the burden of proof and the
action shall proceed as follows:
(a) Prior to discovery, the court shall set a hearing to determine whether there is probable cause that a
committee or person has violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act;
(b) If, after the hearing in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court determines that no probable cause
exists to believe that a violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act has occurred, the court shall enter an
order of dismissal with prejudice;
(c) If, after the hearing in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the court determines that probable cause
does exist to believe that a violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act has occurred, the court shall enter
an order to that effect and the case shall proceed to trial on an expedited basis. Subject to Section 6
of this Act, the entity alleged to have violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act may, prior to the scheduling of
trial, present evidence sufficient to rebut the finding of probable cause by making an ex parte
presentation of records to the court for in camera review; and
(d) The losing party under paragraph (c) of this subsection has the right to:
1. An interlocutory expedited appeal; and
2. A stay of proceedings in the trial court.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of a finding that a committee has violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act, the committee
shall refund the contribution to the original contributor. In the event of an appeal, the contribution shall be
placed in escrow, after which the funds shall be disbursed in accordance with the final order. If the
committee is unable to return the funds, the directors, officers, or executive members of the committee shall
be liable in their personal capacity, jointly and severally, for the refund of said funds.
(4) Within thirty (30) days of a finding that any person or entity required to report independent expenditures
has violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act, the person or entity making the independent expenditure shall
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
disgorge funds in an amount equal to the reported cost of the independent expenditure to the registry. If the
entity is unable to disgorge the requisite funds, the directors, officers, or executive members of the entity
shall be liable in their personal capacities, jointly and severally, for the payment of the amount due. In the
event of an appeal, the funds subject to disgorgement shall be placed in escrow, after which they shall be
disbursed in accordance with the final order.
(5) If any lobbyist, as defined in KRS 11A.010, violates Section 2 or 3 of this Act, the lobbyist's registration may
be revoked or suspended and the lobbyist may be enjoined from receiving compensation or making
expenditures for lobbying.
(6) If the registry prevails in an action brought under this section, the court may award:
(a) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from violating or engaging in acts that aid or
abet violations of Sections 2 and 3 of this Act; and
(b) Statutory damages up to two (2) times the amount of the prohibited contribution or expenditure.
(7) In addition to the penalties in subsection (6) of this section, and any other remedies provided by law, if the
court finds a knowing or willful violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act, the court may assess a penalty of up
to three (3) times the statutory damages.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 121 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A lawful donor to a tax-exempt organization possesses a right of privacy in his or her donations. Any
investigation of an alleged violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act, or lawful court order in an action brought
under Section 5 of this Act, shall shield the identity of lawful donors as far as possible. A state or local
governmental entity, court, or officer of the court shall not collect or require the submission of information
on the identity of any donor to a tax-exempt organization other than those directly related to an alleged
violation of Section 2 or 3 of this Act.
(2) A state or local governmental entity, court, or officer of the court shall not disclose to the public, or to
another government official not directly involved in the investigation, information revealing the identity of
any donor to a tax-exempt organization, unless the information is regarding the identity of a donor that
engaged in conduct prohibited by Section 2 or 3 of this Act after a final determination has been made that
the donor violated Section 2 or 3 of this Act.
(3) Any state or local governmental entity, court, or officer of the court who knowingly or willfully violates
subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 7. KRS 121.175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No candidate, committee, or contributing organization shall permit funds in a campaign account to be
expended for any purpose other than for allowable campaign expenditures. "Allowable campaign
expenditures" means expenditures including reimbursement for actual expenses, made directly and primarily
in support of or opposition to a candidate, constitutional amendment, or public question which will appear on
the ballot and includes, but is not limited to, expenditures for staff salaries, gifts and meals for volunteer
campaign workers and fundraisers, food and beverages provided at a campaign rally, advertising, office
space, necessary travel if reported, campaign paraphernalia, purchases of advertisements in athletic and
scholastic publications, communications with constituents or prospective voters, polling and consulting,
printing, graphic arts, or advertising services, postage, office supplies, stationery, newsletters, and equipment
which is used primarily for the administration of the campaign, or for fees incurred from legal services while
defending a matter before the Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission in which the final adjudication is
rendered in favor of the candidate. "Allowable campaign expenditures" does not include necessary travel
unless reported, expenditures of funds in a campaign account for any purpose made unlawful by other
provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or which would bestow a private pecuniary benefit, except for
payment of the reasonable value of goods and services provided upon a candidate, member of the candidate's
family, committee, or contributing organization, or any of their employees, paid or unpaid, including: tickets to
an event which is unrelated to a political campaign or candidacy; items of personal property for distribution to
prospective voters except items bearing the name, likeness, or logo of a candidate or a campaign-related
communication; expenditures to promote or oppose a candidacy for a leadership position in a governmental,
professional, or political organization, or other entity; and equipment or appliances the primary use of which is
for purposes outside of the campaign. The provisions of KRS 121.190 notwithstanding, a candidate shall not
be required to include a disclaimer on campaign stationery purchased with funds from his campaign account.
(2) A member of the General Assembly may utilize funds in his or her campaign account to:

CHAPTER 57 7
(a) Contribute up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year to a political party or caucus campaign
committee;
(b) Contribute directly to another candidate, slate of candidates, political party, or caucus campaign
committee until his or her campaign funds have been exhausted and the account has been closed, if
the amount of the contribution does not exceed the contribution limits contained in KRS 121.150(6)
and (11);
(c) Make allowable campaign expenditures in both election years and nonelection years;
(d)[(c)] Upon approval by the President of the Senate or the Speaker of the House of Representatives,
depending on the member's chamber:
1. Attend a conference, meeting, reception, or similar event; or
2. Attend an educational course or seminar that maintains or improves skills employed by the
member in carrying out the duties of his or her elective office; and
(e)[(d)] Pay for fees incurred from legal services while defending a matter arising from his or her
campaign or election or the performance of his or her official duties.
(3) [By December 31, 1993, ]The registry shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement and enforce
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In lieu of the penalties provided in KRS 121.140 and 121.990 for a violation of this section, the registry may,
after hearing:
(a) For a violation which was not committed knowingly, order the violator to repay the amount of
campaign funds which were expended for other than allowable campaign expenditures, and if not repaid
within thirty (30) days, may impose a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the amount
is not repaid, up to a maximum fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000); and
(b) For a violation which was committed knowingly, in addition to referring the matter for criminal
prosecution, order the violator to repay the amount of campaign funds which were expended for other
than allowable campaign expenditures, and if not repaid within thirty (30) days, may impose a fine of
up to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day the amount is not repaid, up to a maximum fine of one
thousand dollars ($1,000).
Section 8. KRS 121.180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) 1. Persons becoming a candidate as defined in KRS 121.015(8) or slate of candidates as defined in
KRS 121.015(9), or a political issues committee as defined in KRS 121.015(3)(d), shall submit a
form prescribed and furnished by the registry indicating whether they intend to raise or spend in
excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, or that contributions will not be
accepted or expended in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election.
Candidates and slates of candidates shall submit this form to the registry within five (5) days of
receiving contributions or making expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her
nomination or election to public office, or within five (5) days of filing papers to run for public
office, whichever is sooner. Candidates and slates of candidates who advance to a regular
election following a primary shall submit this form to the registry within five (5) days after the
date of the primary. Political issues committees shall submit the form to the registry within five
(5) days of meeting the definition of political issues committee in KRS 121.015(3)(d).
2. Each candidate, slate of candidates, or political issues committee indicating that contributions
will not be accepted or expended in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1)
election shall be exempt from filing any campaign finance reports required by subsection (3) of
this section.
3. A separate form shall be required for each primary, regular, or special election in which the
candidate or slate of candidates participates or in which the public question appears on the ballot.
The form shall be submitted by means of electronic filing with the registry.
4. Any person acting as a candidate or slate of candidates by receiving contributions or making
expenditures with a view to bringing about his or her nomination or election to public office, or
filing papers to run for public office, or group of persons acting as a political issues committee,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
who fails to file this form as required, or who fails to remedy a deficiency within five (5) days,
may be fined by the registry an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per day, up to a
maximum total fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(b) For a primary, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file a request for exemption not later than the
deadline described in paragraph (a) of this subsection for filing nomination papers and, except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its terms unless it is
rescinded in writing not later than thirty (30) days preceding the primary. For a regular election, a
candidate or slate of candidates shall file or rescind in writing a request for exemption not later than
sixty (60) days preceding the regular election, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of
this subsection. For a special election, a candidate or slate of candidates shall file a request for
exemption not later than ten (10) days after the candidate or slate of candidates is nominated for a
special election and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later than thirty (30)
days preceding the special election. A political issues committee chair shall file a request for exemption
when the committee registers with the registry and shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in
writing not later than thirty (30) days preceding the date the issue appears on the ballot.
(c) 1. A candidate or slate of candidates that revokes a request for exemption in a timely manner shall
file all reports required of a candidate intending to raise or spend in excess of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) in an election. To revoke the request for an exemption, the candidate or slate of
candidates shall file the appropriate form with the registry not later than the deadline for filing a
revocation.
2. A candidate or slate of candidates that is exempted from campaign finance reporting
requirements pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection but who accepts contributions or makes
expenditures in excess of the exempted amount in an election, shall file all applicable reports
required for the remainder of that election, based upon the amount of contributions or
expenditures the candidate or slate of candidates accepts or receives in that election.
(d) Any candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or August filing deadline and that intends
to execute a request for exemption shall file the appropriate request for exemption not later than the
deadline described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be bound by its terms unless it is rescinded in writing not later
than sixty (60) days preceding the regular election. A candidate or slate of candidates that is covered by
this paragraph shall have the same reversion rights as those provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(e) Any candidate or slate of candidates that will appear on the ballot in a regular election that has signed a
request for exemption for that election may exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection if a candidate or slate of candidates that is subject to a June or August
filing deadline subsequently files in opposition to the candidate or slate of candidates. Except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a candidate or slate of candidates
covered by this paragraph shall comply with the deadline for rescission provided in subparagraph 1. of
paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(f) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, any candidate or slate of
candidates that has filed a request for exemption for a regular election that later is opposed by a person
who has filed a declaration of intent to receive write-in votes may rescind the request for exemption and
exercise the reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(g) Any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption may petition the registry to
determine whether another person is campaigning as a write-in candidate prior to having filed a
declaration of intent to receive write-in votes, and, if the registry determines upon a preponderance of
the evidence that a person who may later be a write-in candidate is conducting a campaign, the
candidate or slate of candidates, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this
subsection, may petition the registry to permit the candidate or slate of candidates to exercise the
reversion rights provided in subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(h) If the opponent of a candidate or slate of candidates is replaced due to his or her withdrawal because of
death, disability, or disqualification, the candidate or slate of candidates, except as provided in
subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, may exercise the reversion rights provided in
subparagraph 1. of paragraph (c) of this subsection not later than fifteen (15) days after the party
executive committee nominates a replacement for the withdrawn candidate or slate of candidates.

CHAPTER 57 9
(i) A person intending to be a write-in candidate for any office in a regular or special election may execute
a request for exemption under paragraph (a) of this subsection and shall be bound by its terms unless it
is rescinded in writing not later than fifteen (15) days preceding the regular or special election. A person
intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a request for exemption in a timely manner shall file
all reports required of a candidate intending to raise or spend in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000)
in an election. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a person
intending to be a write-in candidate who revokes a request for exemption shall file the appropriate form
with the registry.
(j) Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, the campaign committee of
any candidate or slate of candidates that has filed a request for exemption or a political issues
committee whose chair has filed a request for exemption shall be bound by its terms unless it is
rescinded in a timely manner.
(k) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, any candidate, slate of
candidates, or political issues committee that is exempt from filing campaign finance reports
pursuant to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that accepts contributions or makes
expenditures, or whose campaign treasurer accepts contributions or makes expenditures, in
excess of the applicable limit in any one (1) election without rescinding the request for
exemption in a timely manner shall comply with all applicable reporting requirements and, in
lieu of other penalties prescribed by law, pay a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).
2. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of paragraph (c) of this subsection, a candidate, slate of
candidates, campaign committee, or political issues committee that is exempt from filing
campaign finance reports pursuant to paragraph (a), (d), or (i) of this subsection that knowingly
accepts contributions or makes expenditures in excess of the applicable spending limit in any one
(1) election without rescinding the request for exemption in a timely manner shall comply with
all applicable reporting requirements and shall be guilty of a Class D felony.
(l) 1. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary shall file a report described
in subsection (4) of this section.
2. Any candidate exempt from filing under this subsection for a primary who advances to the
regular election shall file for an additional exemption under this section for the regular election
or the candidate shall no longer be exempt from the filing requirements.
3. In the event a candidate exempt from filing under this subsection is no longer eligible for the
exemption, he or she shall immediately file for a revocation of the exemption under paragraph
(c) of this subsection.
(2) (a) State and county executive committees, and caucus campaign committees shall make a full report, upon
a prescribed form, to the registry, of all money, loans, or other things of value, received from any
source, and expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last report, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business
address of the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a
description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full name, address, age if
less than the legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the
employer and occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under
which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement of
expenditures shall include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made
in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
(b) In addition to the reporting requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the state executive
committee of a political party that has established a building fund account under KRS 121.172 shall
make a full report, upon a prescribed form, to the registry, of all contributions received from any source,
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
and expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last report for the separate building
fund account, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a corporation, the name and business address of
the corporation, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the
major business conducted by the corporation;
2. For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full name and address of the
contributor, the date of the contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the employer and
occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under which he or
she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement of
expenditures shall include the name and address of each person to whom an expenditure is made
in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure.
(c) The report required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made on a semiannual basis if the
committee has more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in its campaign fund account, and shall be
received by the registry by January 31 and by July 31. The January report shall cover the period from
July 1 to December 31. The July report shall cover the period from January 1 to June 30. If the
committee has less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in its campaign fund account the report required
by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be made on an annual basis, and shall be received by the
registry by January 31. If an individual gives a reportable contribution to a caucus campaign committee
or to a state or county executive committee with the intention that the contribution or a portion of the
contribution go to a candidate or slate of candidates, the name of the contributor and the sum shall be
indicated on the committee report. The report required by paragraph (b) of this subsection relating to a
state executive committee's building fund account shall be received by the registry within two (2)
business days after the close of each calendar quarter. The receipts and expenditures of funds remitted
to each political party under KRS 141.071 to 141.073 shall be separately accounted for and reported to
the registry in the manner required by KRS 121.230. The separate report may be made a separate
section within the report required by this subsection to be received by the registry by January 31.
(3) (a) Except for candidates or slates of candidates, campaign committees, or political issues committees
exempted from reporting requirements pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, each campaign
treasurer of a candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, or political issues committee who
accepts contributions or expends, expects to accept contributions or expend, or contracts to expend
more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, and each fundraiser who secures
contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any one (1) election, shall make a full report
to the registry, on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry, of all money, loans, or
other things of value, received from any source, and expenditures authorized, incurred, and made, since
the date of the last report, including:
1. For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business
address of the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a
description of the major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent
committee;
2. For each contribution in excess of one hundred dollars ($100) made to any candidate or
campaign committee or a political issues committee, the full name, address, age if less than the
legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the employer
and occupation of each other contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under
which he or she is doing business shall be listed;
3. The total amount of cash contributions received during the reporting period; and
4. A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made. The complete statement
of expenditures shall include the name, address, and occupation of each person to whom an
expenditure is made in excess of twenty-five dollars ($25), and the amount, date, and purpose of
each expenditure.
(b) Reports of all candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall be made as follows:

CHAPTER 57 11
1. a. Candidates seeking statewide office, slates of candidates, campaign committees for
candidates seeking statewide office and for slates of candidates, independent expenditure-
only committees, political issues committees, and fundraisers which file the form
described in subsection (1)(a) of this section before the year of an election in which the
candidate, a slate of candidates, or public question shall appear on the ballot, shall file
financial reports with the registry at the end of the first calendar quarter after persons
become statewide candidates or slates of candidates, or following registration of the
committee or fundraiser, and each calendar quarter thereafter, ending with the last
calendar quarter of that year. The provisions of this subparagraph shall be retroactive to
January 1, 2021;
b. All other candidates and campaign committees shall file annual financial reports to be
received by the registry on or before December 1 for each year that a candidate is not yet
on the ballot but has filed a form as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section with the
registry for a future-year election; and
c. Candidates, slate of candidates, or committees shall make all reports required by
subparagraphs 2. to 5. of this paragraph during the year in which the election takes place;
2. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
sixtieth day preceding a regular election, including all previous contributions and expenditures;
3. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
thirtieth day preceding an election, including all previous contributions and expenditures;
4. All candidates, slates of candidates, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make reports on the
fifteenth day preceding the date of the election; and
5. All reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during the entire reporting period and
must be received by the registry within two (2) business days after the date the reporting period
ends to be deemed timely filed.
(4) All candidates, regardless of funds received or expended, campaign committees, independent expenditure-only
committees, political issues committees, and registered fundraisers shall make post-election reports within
thirty (30) days after the election. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during
the entire reporting period and must be received by the registry within two (2) business days after the date the
reporting period ends to be deemed timely filed. For candidates, slates of candidates, and political issues
committees otherwise exempt under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the reporting period begins the day the
request for exemption is filed with the registry and continues through the thirtieth day after the election.
(5) In making the preceding reports, the total gross receipts from each of the following categories shall be listed:
proceeds from the sale of tickets for events such as testimonial affairs, dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar
fundraising events, mass collections made at the events, and sales of items such as campaign pins, buttons,
hats, ties, literature, and similar materials. When any individual purchase or the aggregate purchases of any
item enumerated above from a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office or a
campaign committee for a candidate or slate of candidates for a statewide-elected state office exceeds one
hundred dollars ($100), the purchaser shall be identified by name, address, age, if less than the legal voting
age, occupation, and employer or, if the purchaser is self-employed, the name under which he or she is doing
business, and the amount of the purchase. When any individual purchase or the aggregate purchases of any
item enumerated above from any candidate or campaign committee other than a candidate or slate of
candidates for a statewide-elected state office or campaign committee for a candidate or slate of candidates for
a statewide-elected state office exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), the purchaser shall be identified by name,
address, age if less than the legal voting age, occupation, and employer or, if the purchaser is self-employed,
the name under which he or she is doing business, and the amount of the purchase. The lists shall be
maintained by the campaign treasurer, political issues committee treasurer, registered fundraiser, or other
sponsor for inspection by the registry for six (6) years following the date of the election.
(6) Each permanent committee, except a federally registered political committee as defined in 52 U.S.C. sec.
30101(4)(a), inaugural committee, or contributing organization shall make a full report to the registry, on a
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
form provided or using a format approved by the registry, of all money, loans, or other things of value,
received by it from any source, and all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, since the date of the last
report, including:
(a) For each contribution of any amount made by a permanent committee, the name and business address of
the permanent committee, the date of the contribution, the amount contributed, and a description of the
major business, social, or political interest represented by the permanent committee;
(b) For other contributions in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), the full name, address, age if under the
legal voting age, the date of the contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the employer and
occupation of each contributor. If the contributor is self-employed, the name under which he or she is
doing business shall be listed;
(c) An aggregate amount of cash contributions, the amount contributed by each contributor, and the date of
each contribution; and
(d) A complete statement of all expenditures authorized, incurred, or made, including independent
expenditures. This report shall be made by a permanent committee, inaugural committee, or
contributing organization to the registry on the last day of the first calendar quarter following the
registration of the committee with the registry and on the last day of each succeeding calendar quarter
until such time as the committee terminates. A contributing organization shall file a report of
contributions received and expenditures on a form provided or using a format approved by the registry
not later than the last day of each calendar quarter in which contributions are received or expenditures
are made. All reports to the registry shall be received on or before each filing deadline, and any report
received by the registry within two (2) business days after each filing deadline shall be deemed timely
filed.
(7) If the final statement of a candidate, campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee, or
political issues committee shows an unexpended balance of contributions, continuing debts and obligations, or
an expenditure deficit, the campaign treasurer shall file with the registry a supplemental statement of
contributions and expenditures not more than thirty (30) days after the deadline for filing the final statement.
Subsequent supplemental statements shall be filed annually, to be received by the registry by December 1 of
each year, until the account shows no unexpended balance, continuing debts and obligations, expenditures, or
deficit. All post-election reports to the registry shall cover campaign activity during the entire reporting period
and must be received by the registry within two (2) business days after the date the reporting period ends to be
deemed timely filed. All contributions shall be subject to KRS 121.150 as of the date of the election in which
the candidate appeared on the ballot.
(8) All reports filed under the provisions of this chapter shall be a matter of public record open to inspection by
any member of the public immediately upon receipt of the report by the registry.
(9) A candidate or slate of candidates is relieved of the duty personally to file reports and keep records of receipts
and expenditures if the candidate or slate states in writing or on forms provided by the registry that:
(a) Within five (5) business days after personally receiving any contributions, the candidate or slate of
candidates shall surrender possession of the contributions to the treasurer of their campaign committee
without expending any of the proceeds thereof. No contributions shall be commingled with the
candidate's or slated candidates' personal funds or accounts. Contributions received by check, money
order, or other written instrument shall be endorsed directly to the campaign committee and shall not be
cashed or redeemed by the candidate;
(b) The candidate or slate of candidates shall not make any unreimbursed expenditure for the campaign,
except that this paragraph does not preclude a candidate or slate from making an expenditure from
personal funds to the designated campaign committee, which shall be reported by the committee as a
contribution received; and
(c) The waiver shall continue in effect as long as the candidate or slate of candidates complies with the
conditions under which it was granted.
(10) (a) No candidate, slate of candidates, campaign committee, independent expenditure-only committee,
political issues committee, or contributing organization shall use or permit the use of contributions or
funds solicited or received for the person or in support of or opposition to a public issue which will
appear on the ballot to:
1. Further the candidacy of the person for a different public office;

CHAPTER 57 13
2. Support or oppose a different public issue; or
3. Further the candidacy of any other person for public office.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a candidate or slate of candidates from using
funds in a campaign account to contribute directly to another candidate or slate of candidates for state
or federal office, or to purchase admission tickets for[, or contribute to,] any fundraising event or
testimonial affair for another candidate or slate of candidates for state or federal office, if the amount of
the purchase or contribution does not exceed the individual contribution limit contained in KRS
121.150(6) or 52 U.S.C. sec. 30116 in any one (1) election.
(c) Any funds or contributions solicited or received by or on behalf of a candidate, slate of candidates, or
any committee, which has been organized in whole or in part to further any candidacy for the same
person or to support or oppose the same public issue, shall be deemed to have been solicited or received
for the current candidacy or for the election on the public issue if the funds or contributions are solicited
or received at any time prior to the regular election for which the candidate, slate of candidates, or
public issue is on the ballot.
(d) Any unexpended balance of funds not otherwise obligated for the payment of expenses incurred to
further a political issue or the candidacy of a person shall, in whole or in part, at the election of the
candidate or committee:
1. Escheat to the State Treasury;
2. Be returned pro rata to all contributors;
3. In the case of a partisan candidate, be transferred to:
a. A caucus campaign committee; or
b. The state or county executive committee of the political party of which the candidate is a
member;
4. Be retained to further the same public issue or to seek election to the same office; or
5. Be donated to any charitable, nonprofit, or educational institution recognized under Section
501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and any successor
thereto, from which the candidate or committee receives no financial benefit.
(11) If adequate and appropriate agency funds are available to implement this subsection, electronic reporting shall
be made available by the registry to all candidates, slates of candidates, committees, contributing
organizations, registered fundraisers, and persons making independent expenditures. The electronic report
submitted to the registry shall be the official campaign finance report for audit and other legal purposes,
whether mandated or filed by choice.
(12) The date that an electronic or on-line report shall be deemed to have been filed with the registry shall be the
date on which it is received by the registry.
(13) All electronic or online filers shall affirm, under penalty of perjury, that the report filed with the registry is
complete and accurate.
(14) Filers who submit electronic campaign finance reports which are not readable, or cannot be copied shall be
deemed to not be in compliance with the requirements set forth in this section.
(15) Beginning with the primary scheduled in calendar year 2020, and for each subsequent election scheduled
thereafter, reports required to be submitted to the registry involving candidates, slates of candidates,
committees, contributing organizations, and independent expenditures shall be reported electronically.
(16) (a) On each form that the registry supplies for the reports required under subsections (2), (3), and (6) of this
section, the registry shall include an entry reading, "No change since last report."
(b) If a person or entity that is required to report under subsection (2), (3), or (6) of this section has received
no money, loans, or other things of value from any source since the date of its last report and has not
authorized, incurred, or made any expenditures since that date, the person or entity may check or
otherwise designate the entry that reads, "No change since last report." A person or entity designating
this entry in a report shall state the balance carried forward from the last report but need not specify
receipts or expenditures in further detail.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 9. KRS 121.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All newspaper or magazine advertising, posters, circulars, billboards, handbills, sample ballots, and paid-for
television or radio announcements, or any other type of general public political advertising, which expressly
advocate the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, slate of candidates, or group of candidates for
nomination or election to any public office, or expressly advocate or oppose a ballot measure, shall be
identified by the words "paid for by" followed by the name and address of the individual or committee which
paid for the communication; except that if paid for by a candidate, slate of candidates, or campaign committee,
it shall be identified only by the words "paid for by" followed by the name of the candidate, slate of
candidates, or campaign committee, whichever is applicable. For television and radio broadcasts, compliance
with Federal Communications Commission regulations regarding sponsored programs and broadcasts by
candidates for public office shall be considered compliance with this section.
(2) The disclaimer described in subsection (1) of this section shall appear and be presented in a clear and
conspicuous manner to give the reader or observer adequate notice of the identity of the purchaser of the
communication. A disclaimer does not comply with this section if the disclaimer is difficult to read or if the
placement of the disclaimer is easily overlooked.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Any news articles, editorial endorsements, opinion, or commentary writings, or letter to the editor
printed in a newspaper, magazine, flyer, pamphlet, or other periodical not owned or controlled by a
candidate or committee;
(b) Any editorial endorsements or opinions aired by a broadcast facility not owned or controlled by a
candidate or committee;
(c) Any communication by a person made in the regular course and scope of the person's business or any
communication made by a membership organization solely to members of the organization and the
members' families; and
(d) Any communication that refers to any candidate only as part of the popular name of a bill or statute.
(4) (a) A person shall not use, cause or permit to be used, or continue to use any published, distributed, or
broadcast political advertising containing express advocacy that the person knows does not include the
disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section. A person is presumed to know that the use of
political advertising is prohibited by this subsection if the registry notifies the person in writing that the
use is prohibited.
(b) A person who learns that political advertising signs that have been distributed do not include the
disclosure required by subsection (1) of this section or include a disclosure that does not comply with
subsection (1) of this section does not commit a violation of this subsection if the person makes a good-
faith attempt to remove or correct those signs within forty-eight (48) hours and provides the registry
with proof of correction.
(5) The management of newspapers and magazines shall keep a one (1) year record of all statements, articles, or
advertisements referred to in subsection (1) of this section, that appear in their publications, however, nothing
in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to require editors or editorial writers of newspapers and
magazines to identify themselves in the manner therein required with any article or editorial written by them as
part of their duties as an employee or employer.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.